Hawaii statutes.
SUBTITLE 4.
FORESTRY AND WILDLIFE;

RECREATION
AREAS; FIRE PROTECTION

Note

Subtitle heading amended by L 1981, c 85, §1.

CHAPTER
183

FOREST RESERVES, WATER DEVELOPMENT, ZONING

Part I. General

Section

183-1 Definitions

183-1.5 Duties in general

183-2 Rules

183-3 Administrator

183-4 General penalty

183-5 General administrative penalties

Part II. Forest Reserves

183-11 Government land for forest reserves

183-12 Notice of hearing

183-13 Hearing

183-14 Vested rights protected

183-15 Surrender of private land

183-16 Revenue from forest reserves

183-16.5 Harvesting from state-owned lands

183-17 Timber trespass in forest reserves

183-18 Criminal penalties

183-19 Exclusion of livestock from forest
reserves, game

management areas, public hunting areas,
and natural

area reserves; notice

183-20 Disposition

183-21 Penalties

183-22 Disposition of fines, etc.

Part III. Water Development

183-31 Watershed areas

183-32 Use of funds, etc.

183-33 Effect on other agencies

183-34 Use of lands and funds

183-35 Vouchers for expenditures

Part IV. Zoning

183-41 Repealed

183-42 Strip mining; prior approval of license or
permit

183-43 Repealed

183-44 Fishponds; rules

183-45 Accreted land

Note

Chapter title amended by L 1988, c 337, §1.

L 2014, c 218, §8 purports to amend this chapter.

Department of transportation's bridge rehabilitation and
replacement program; temporary exemption from certain construction requirements
of this chapter through June 30, 2017 or until completion. L 2012, c 218.

Cross References

Environmental courts, jurisdiction over proceedings arising
under this chapter, see §604A-2.

Law Journals and Reviews

Residential Use of Hawai`i's Conservation District. 14 UH L.
Rev. 633.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next